California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(a) As used in this section “nonnative wild animal” means any nonnative animal species, or hybrid thereof, that is not normally domesticated pursuant to this code or regulations adopted pursuant thereto and that is not designated as a furbearing, game, nongame, threatened, or endangered animal.

(b) No person shall import into this state any live nonnative wild animal except pursuant to this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(c) Any live nonnative wild animal that is possessed or transported within this state in violation of this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant thereto shall be disposed of in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to Section 2122, at the expense of the owner or possessor. The owner or possessor shall pay the costs associated with the seizure, care, holding, transfer, and destruction of the animal.

(d) Any live, nonnative wild animal found at large within this state shall be either summarily destroyed or, if captured, shall be confined for not less than 72 hours following notification of the local humane society. Any local, state, or federal governmental agency that has public safety responsibilities is authorized to implement this subdivision.

(e) If, during the 72-hour holding period, any person claims ownership of the animal, that person shall only be allowed to dispose of the animal pursuant to subdivision (c).

(f) After the 72-hour holding period, if the animal is unclaimed, it shall be disposed of in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to Section 2122 unless the animal is listed as a threatened or endangered species by either state or federal regulation. Notwithstanding subdivision (c), if the animal is listed as a threatened or endangered species in either regulation, the department shall be notified of the animal’s location and the department shall be responsible for proper disposition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2190.

It is unlawful for any person who keeps in confinement, with or without a permit, any wild animal of a species enumerated in or designated pursuant to Section 2118, to liberate, ship, or transport the animal except in accordance with the conditions of a permit first obtained from the department.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2189 by Stats. 1961, Ch. 617.)
-------------------------------------------

2192.

Notwithstanding Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18900) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, Section 11356 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law, regulations of the commission relating to the construction, fixtures, and other minimum caging standards adopted by the commission for the confinement of live wild animals pursuant to this chapter are not building standards subject to the approval of the State Building Standards Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2193.

(a) Every person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Section 2150 shall immediately report by telephone the intentional or unintentional escape or release of the wild animal, to the department and the nearest enforcing officer of the city or county in which the wild animal was released or escaped. The permitholder shall be liable for all expenses associated with efforts to recapture the wild animal. For the purposes of this subdivision, the exhibition of a wild animal on a movie set, film set, television set, still photography set, or any other professional activity allowable under a permit issued pursuant to Section 2150, does not constitute an intentional or unintentional escape or release of the wild animal unless the person exhibiting the wild animal has lost control of the wild animal.

(b) The commission shall promulgate regulations establishing the criteria for permitholders to notify the department prior to taking possession of or transferring an animal and upon the death of an animal.

(c) These regulations shall be developed and adopted by the commission on or before January 1, 2007.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 698, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2195.

When a wild animal enumerated in, or designated pursuant to, Section 671 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations is properly confiscated by the department, the new custodian with whom the animal is placed by the department may bring a civil action to recover the reasonable costs incurred by the custodian for any necessary relocation of the animal to a new facility, any actual and necessary costs to construct new caging to house the animal, and any actual and necessary costs to return the animal to a healthy state, to the extent that the department or new custodian has not already collected the costs pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 2125. The prior owner or possessor from whom the animal was confiscated shall be liable for these costs only if the conditions that led to the animal’s confiscation were the result of acts or omissions of the prior owner or possessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 698, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Mammals Used for Hire [2200. - 2203.]

2200.

For purposes of this article, “mammal” means any wild animal of the class Mammalia as specified in Article 1 (commencing with Section 2116) or regulations adopted pursuant thereto which affects commerce.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1231, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2201.

The Animal Trust Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the money in the fund is available to the department for the administration of this article and to make grants pursuant to Section 2203. The department may use not more than 5 percent of the money in the fund for the costs of administering this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1231, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2202.

The department may seek grants and accept donations from private and public organizations and agencies for the purposes of this article for deposit in the Animal Trust Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1231, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2203.

(a) The director, with the advice of the committee established pursuant to Section 2150.3, shall adopt regulations to establish and administer a grant program, including eligibility criteria, by which persons or governmental agencies who operate facilities to care and shelter mammals may apply for grants for maintenance, operations, and capital improvements. The program shall include provisions for emergency grants with an expedited review process.

(b) Each member of the committee who is eligible to receive per diem and mileage shall be allowed per diem and mileage in accordance with the rules of the Department of Human Resources for attending any meeting of the committee involving this
 article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 14.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Circus Cruelty Prevention Act [2207. - 2210.]

2207.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Circus Cruelty Prevention Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 768, Sec. 1.   (SB 313)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2208.

(a) For purposes of this article, except as provided in subdivision (b), the term “circus” means a performance before a live audience in which entertainment consisting of a variety of acts, such as acrobats, aerialists, clowns, jugglers, or stunts, is the primary attraction or principal business.

(b) The term “circus” does not include a rodeo, as defined
 in Section 596.7 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 768, Sec. 1.   (SB 313)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2209.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a person shall not sponsor, conduct, or operate a circus in this state that uses any animal other than a domestic dog, domestic cat, or domesticated horse.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a person shall not exhibit or use any animal other than a domestic dog, domestic cat, or domesticated horse in a circus in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 768, Sec. 1.   (SB 313)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2210.

(a) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person who violates this article, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this article, shall be liable for a civil penalty of no more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each day the person is in violation.

(b) An action against a person who violates this article, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this article, may be brought by the Attorney General, the department, the Department of Food and Agriculture, a district attorney, a city attorney, or a city prosecutor in a city or city and county that has a full-time city prosecutor.

(c) Civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited according to the
 following:

(1) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), moneys collected by the Attorney General shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(B) If the department, as the investigating agency, refers the matter to the Attorney General for prosecution, 50 percent of the moneys collected shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund and 50 percent shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(2) Moneys collected by the department shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund. The moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be allocated, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department for law enforcement purposes.

(3) Moneys collected by the Department of Food and Agriculture shall be deposited in the Circus
 Cruelty Prevention Account, which is hereby created in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund, created pursuant to Section 221 of the Food and Agricultural Code. Moneys in the Circus Cruelty Prevention Account shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Food and Agriculture for the purposes of enforcing this article.

(4) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), moneys collected by a district attorney, a city attorney, or a city prosecutor in a city or city and county that has a full-time city prosecutor shall be deposited in that city’s, county’s, or city and county’s general fund.

(B) If the department, as the investigating agency, refers the matter to the office of a prosecutor described in subparagraph (A), 50 percent of the moneys collected shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund and 50 percent shall be
 deposited in the city’s, county’s, or city and county’s general fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 118.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Importation and Transportation of Live Plants and Animals [2225. - 2272.]



  ARTICLE 1. Birds [2225. - 2225.]

2225.

Except as otherwise provided, it is unlawful for any common carrier to transport any live protected nongame bird or any live resident or migratory game bird for which there is no open season.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1972.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Mammals [2250. - 2250.]

2250.

It is unlawful to import or transport any live muskrat (genus Ondatra) into, or possess any live muskrat in, California except under permit issued by the department pursuant to Section 2118, or as otherwise provided by law. A county agricultural commissioner, fish and game deputy, or state plant quarantine officer may enter upon lands or waters west of the crest of the Cascade-Sierra Nevada mountain system, and west and south of the Tehachapi, Liebre, San Gabriel, San Bernardino, San Jacinto, Cuyamaca, and connected mountains south to the international boundary, or in any watershed tributary to, or draining into, the Pacific Ocean to remove or destroy the muskrats.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 101.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Aquatic Plants and Animals [2270. - 2272.]

2270.

It is unlawful for any person to receive, bring, or cause to be brought into this state, for the purpose of propagation, any fish, reptile, amphibian, or aquatic plant from any place wherein any infected, diseased, or parasitized fish, reptile, amphibia, or aquatic plants are known to exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 605.)
-------------------------------------------

2270.5.

Section 2270 does not apply to the importation of live aquatic plants or animals for aquaculture purposes by a registered aquaculturist if the importation has been approved by the department pursuant to Section 15600.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1686, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

2271.

(a) No live aquatic plant or animal may be imported into this state without the prior written approval of the department pursuant to regulations adopted by the commission. A written application for the importation, submitted in conformance with the procedural requirements established by the commission, is deemed approved where it has not been denied within 60 days.

(b) This section does not apply to the following plants or animals unless the plants or animals are or may be placed in waters of the state:

(1) Mollusks.

(2) Crustaceans.

(3) Ornamental marine or freshwater plants and animals that are not utilized for human consumption or bait purposes and are maintained in closed systems for personal, pet industry, or hobby purposes.

(c) The section does not apply to any live aquatic plant or animal imported by a registered aquaculturist.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 85, Sec. 4.   Effective April 19, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

2272.

Each package containing any live aquatic plant or animal shall bear, in a conspicuous place, a tag on which shall be stated the name and address of the consignor, the name and address of the consignee, and the exact contents of the package.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 85, Sec. 5.   Effective April 19, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Aquatic Invasive Species [2300. - 2303.]

2300.

(a) No person shall sell, possess, import, transport, transfer, release alive in the state, or give away without consideration the salt water algae of the genus Caulerpa.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person may possess, for bona fide scientific research, as determined by the department, upon authorization by the department, the salt water algae of the
 genus Caulerpa.

(c) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who violates this section is subject to a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 119, Sec. 1.   (AB 655)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2301.

(a) (1) Except as authorized by the department, a person shall not possess, import, ship, or transport in the state, or place, plant, or cause to be placed or planted in any water within the state, invasive mussels.

(2) The director or the director’s designee may do all of the following:

(A) Conduct inspections of conveyances, which include vehicles, boats and other watercraft, containers, and trailers, that may carry or contain adult or larval invasive mussels. Included as part of this authority to conduct inspections is the authority to temporarily stop conveyances that may carry or contain adult
 or larval invasive mussels on any roadway or waterway in order to conduct inspections.

(B) Order that areas in a conveyance that contain water be drained, dried, or decontaminated pursuant to procedures approved by the department.

(C) Impound or quarantine conveyances in locations designated by the department for the period of time necessary to ensure that invasive mussels can no longer live on or in the conveyance.

(D) (i) Conduct inspections of waters of the state and facilities located within waters of the state that may contain invasive mussels. If invasive mussels are detected or may be present, the director or the director’s designee may order the affected waters or facilities closed to
 conveyances or otherwise restrict access to the affected waters or facilities, and shall order that conveyances removed from, or introduced to, the affected waters or facilities be inspected, quarantined, or disinfected in a manner and for a duration necessary to detect and prevent the spread of invasive mussels within the state.

(ii) For the purpose of implementing clause (i), the director or the director’s designee shall order the closure or quarantine of, or restrict access to, these waters, areas, or facilities in a manner and duration necessary to detect and prevent the spread of invasive mussels within the state. A closure, quarantine, or restriction shall not be authorized by the director or the director’s
 designee without the concurrence of the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency. If a closure lasts longer than seven days, the department shall update the operator of the affected facility every 10 days on efforts to address the invasive mussel infestation. The department shall provide these updates in writing and also post these updates on the department’s internet website in an easily accessible manner.

(iii) The department shall develop procedures to ensure proper notification of affected local and federal agencies, and, as appropriate, the Department of Water Resources, the Department of Parks and Recreation, and the State Lands Commission in the event of a decision to close, quarantine, or restrict a facility pursuant to this paragraph. These procedures shall include the reasons for the closure, quarantine, or
 restriction, and methods for providing updated information to those affected. These procedures shall also include protocols for the posting of the notifications on the department’s internet website required by clause (ii).

(iv) When deciding the scope, duration, level, and type of restrictions, and specific location of a closure or quarantine, the director shall consult with the agency, entity, owner, or operator with jurisdiction, control, or management responsibility over the marina, boat launch facility, or other facility, in order to focus the closure or quarantine to specific areas and facilities so as to avoid or minimize disruption of economic or recreational activity in the vicinity.

(b) (1) Upon a determination by the director that it would further the
 purposes of this section, other parties or state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Water Resources, the Department of Food and Agriculture, and the State Lands Commission, may exercise the authority, or portions of that authority, granted to the department in subdivision (a).

(2) A determination made pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be in writing and shall remain in effect until withdrawn, in writing, by the director.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code does not apply to the implementation of this section.

(2) An action undertaken pursuant to subparagraph
 (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) involving the use of chemicals other than salt or hot water to decontaminate a conveyance or a facility is subject to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(d) (1) A public or private agency that operates a water supply system shall cooperate with the department to implement measures to avoid infestation by invasive mussels and to control or eradicate any infestation that may occur in a water supply system. If invasive mussels are detected, the operator of the water supply system, in cooperation with the department, shall prepare and implement a plan to control or eradicate invasive mussels within the system, and eliminate or minimize any potential downstream transport of an invasive mussel. The approved plan shall contain the
 following minimum elements:

(A) Methods for delineation of infestation, including both adult mussels and veligers.

(B) Methods for control or eradication of adult mussels and decontamination of water containing larval mussels.

(C) A systematic monitoring program to determine any changes in conditions.

(D) The requirement that the operator of the water supply system permit inspections by the department as well as cooperate with the department to update or revise control or eradication measures in the approved plan to address scientific advances in the methods of controlling or eradicating mussels and veligers.

(2) If the operator of water delivery and storage facilities for public water supply purposes has prepared, initiated, and is in compliance with all the elements of an approved plan to control or eradicate invasive mussels in accordance with paragraph (1), the requirements of subdivision (a) do not apply to the operation of those water delivery and storage facilities, and the operator is not subject to any civil or criminal liability for the introduction of invasive mussel species as a result of those operations. The department may require the operator of a facility to update its plan, and if the plan is not updated or revised as described in this subdivision, subdivision (a) shall apply to the operation of the water delivery and storage facilities covered by the plan until the operator updates or revises the plan and initiates and complies with all of the elements of the updated or
 revised plan.

(3) On or before December 31, 2026, the department shall review all approved plans pursuant to this subdivision and require all plans that do not specifically address all invasive mussel species known to be present in bodies of water in the state as of January 1, 2026, to be updated or revised appropriately to include all invasive mussel species, on or before September 30, 2027.

(4) Every invasive mussel species shall be addressed in a plan pursuant to this subdivision no later than 180 days from the date that the species is listed in a regulation as described in Section 2303. The department shall approve plans or provide written comments and suggestions on plan deficiencies within 180 days from the date of plan submission.

(e) Any entity that discovers invasive mussels within this state shall immediately report the discovery to the department.

(f) (1) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who violates this section, violates any verbal or written order or regulation adopted pursuant to this section, or who resists, delays, obstructs, or interferes with the implementation of this section, is subject to a penalty, in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), that is imposed administratively by the department.

(2) A penalty shall not be imposed pursuant to paragraph (1) unless the department has adopted regulations specifying the amount of the penalty and the procedure for imposing and appealing the penalty.

(g) The department may adopt regulations to carry out this
 section.

(h) Pursuant to Section 818.4 of the Government Code, the department and any other state agency exercising authority under this section shall not be liable with regard to any determination or authorization made pursuant to this section.

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 2.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2301.5.

(a) The department’s Invasive Species Program shall develop, by April 1, 2027, guidance for public and private agencies that operate water supply systems to develop effective control plans pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2301. The guidance shall include relevant protocols, example standards, and statutory requirements of a control plan. Other than the statutory requirements of a control plan contained in the guidance, the guidance is voluntary for a public or private agency that operates a water supply system to comply with.

(b) The
 department’s Invasive Species Program shall develop and publish on the department’s internet website, by April 1, 2027, guidance for scientific research conducted by or for public and private agencies that operate water supply systems that is conducted outside of an infested water supply system and that includes mussel handling procedures to prevent and control the spread of invasive mussels, including biology, ecology, and feasibility studies for
 invasive mussel prevention, mitigation, control, and eradication methods. The guidance shall also include mussel handling standards for mussel handling to minimize any potential negative impacts of the possession, transportation, and disposal of invasive mussels.

(c) The department shall update the spatial distribution maps of invasive
 mussel-infested water bodies posted on its internet website no less than quarterly based on monitoring and reported detections. The maps shall distinguish between reported and confirmed detections of invasive mussels and include the date of the most recent map update to provide the most accurate and up-to-date information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 817, Sec. 3.   (AB 2032)   Effective September 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2302.

(a) Any person, or federal, state, or local agency, district, or authority that owns or manages a reservoir, as defined in Section 6004.5 of the Water Code, where recreational, boating, or fishing activities are permitted, except a privately owned reservoir that is not open to the public, shall do both of the following:

(1) Assess the vulnerability of the reservoir for the introduction of invasive mussel species.

(2) Develop and implement a program designed to prevent the introduction of invasive mussel species.

(b) The program shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Public education.

(2) Monitoring.

(3) Management of those recreational, boating, or fishing activities that are permitted.

(c) Any person, or federal, state, or local agency, district, or authority, that owns or manages a reservoir, as defined in Section 6004.5 of the Water Code, where recreational, boating, or fishing activities of any kind are not permitted, except a privately owned reservoir that is not open to the public, shall, based on its available resources and staffing, include visual monitoring for the presence of mussels as part of its routine field activities.

(d) Any entity that
 owns or manages a reservoir, as defined in Section 6004.5 of the Water Code, except a privately owned reservoir that is not open to the public for recreational, boating, or fishing activities, may refuse the planting of fish in that reservoir by the department unless the department can demonstrate that the fish planting does not present a risk of introducing invasive mussels.

(e) Except as specifically set forth in this section, this section applies both to reservoirs that are owned or managed by governmental entities and reservoirs that are owned or managed by private persons or entities.

(f) Violation of this section is not subject to the sanctions set forth in Section 12000. In lieu of any other penalty provided by law, a person who violates this section shall, instead, be
 subject to a civil penalty, in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation, that is imposed administratively by the department. To the extent that sufficient funds and personnel are available to do so, the department may adopt regulations establishing procedures to implement this subdivision and enforce this section.

(g) This section shall not apply to a reservoir in which
 invasive mussels have been detected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 3.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2303.

For purposes of this chapter, “invasive mussel” means any nonnative detrimental mussel species that is capable of spreading in freshwater and is listed in a regulation adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 2118.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 4.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Importation and Transportation of Dead Birds, Mammals, Fish, Reptiles, and Amphibia [2345. - 2401.]



  ARTICLE 1. Dead Wild Birds, Mammals, Fish, Reptiles, and Amphibia [2345. - 2371.]

2345.

This article applies to all dead wild birds, mammals, fish, reptiles, and amphibians. This article also applies to live mollusks and crustaceans that are transported for purposes other than placement in the waters of this state. This article does not apply to animals imported for purposes of aquaculture under Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2346.

It is unlawful for a common carrier or his or her agent to transport for, or to receive for transportation from, any one person, during any interval of time, more than the bag limit of birds, mammals, fish, reptiles, or amphibians that may legally be taken and possessed by that person during that interval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2347.

It is unlawful for any person to offer for transportation by common carrier during any interval of time more than the bag limit of birds, mammals, fish, reptiles, or amphibians that may legally be taken and possessed by that person during that interval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2348.

(a) The outside of a package offered to or received by a common carrier or the carrier’s agent for transportation, or transported by a common carrier or agent, that contains a bird, mammal, fish, reptile, or amphibian, shall clearly and conspicuously indicate the following:

(1) The name and address of the shipper.

(2) The name and address of the consignee.

(3) The number and kind of bird, mammal, fish, reptile, and amphibian contained in the package.

(b) Licensed commercial fishermen and
 licensed commercial fish dealers are subject to all of the provisions of this section, except that commercial shipments of fish may be indicated by total net weight of each species instead of by numbers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 52.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2349.

No bird, mammal, fish, reptile, or amphibian, except smoked, cured, or dried fish other than trout, may be shipped by parcel post.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2350.

It is unlawful to transport or carry a deer or game bird out of this state, except by the holder of a nonresident hunting license or under a written permit issued by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 53.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2352.

Except as permitted by this code, it is unlawful for any common carrier to transport any protected nongame bird, or to transport any resident or migratory game bird for which there is no open season.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1972.)
-------------------------------------------

2353.

(a) Birds, mammals, fish, reptiles, or amphibians shall not be imported or possessed in this state unless all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The animals were legally taken and legally possessed outside of this state.

(2) This code and regulations adopted pursuant thereto do not expressly prohibit their possession in this state.

 (3) A declaration is submitted to the department or a designated state or federal agency at or immediately before the time of entry, in the form and manner prescribed by the department.

(b) Birds, mammals, fish, reptiles, or amphibians legally taken and legally possessed outside of this state may be imported into this state and possessed without a declaration if the shipment is handled by a common carrier under a bill of lading or as supplies carried into this state by common carriers for use as food for the passengers.

(c) The commission and the department shall not modify this section by any regulation that would prohibit the importation of lawfully killed migratory game birds taken in any other state or country and transported into this state pursuant to the migratory bird regulations adopted annually by the Secretary of the Interior.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2354.

Marlin meat may not be transported out of this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

2355.

Deer may be transported into this State only when in accordance with the law of the state in which the deer was taken, and when in accordance with the law of this State and the regulations of the commission adopted pursuant thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

2356.

(a) It is unlawful to offer for shipment, ship, receive for shipment, or transport from this state, any trout taken in the waters of this state, except as provided in subdivision (b):

(b) The following persons may personally transport from this state not more than one daily bag limit of trout:

(1) The holder of a nonresident sport fishing license.

(2) A person on active military duty with the Armed Forces of the United States who possesses a valid angling license.

(3) A person on active military duty with an auxiliary branch of the
 Armed Forces of the United States who possesses a valid angling license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 49.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2358.

It is unlawful to ship trout into an area where the season is closed unless the shipment is accompanied by a written statement containing the name and address of, and signed by, the person taking the trout, and countersigned, for the purpose of identification, by the agent of the carrier to whom the trout are offered for shipment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

2359.

Except as provided in Section 2363, striped bass may be transported or carried out of or into this state only as follows:

(a) A resident of California, or the holder of a valid nonresident California sportfishing license, lawfully taking striped bass from the Colorado River or from the Arizona shore of that river, may transport or carry the fish taken into California.

(b) A resident of Arizona, or the holder of a valid nonresident Arizona sportfishing license, lawfully taking striped bass from the Colorado River or from the California shore of that river, may transport or carry the fish taken into Arizona.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 50.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2360.

Black bass and spotted bass lawfully taken may be carried or transported into and possessed in an area where the season is closed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

2361.

It is unlawful to import into this state for commercial purposes any salmon of smaller size than can be legally taken under regulations of either the Pacific Fishery Management Council or the state of landing. Such prohibition does not apply to domestically reared salmon as defined by commission regulations to include salmon which have returned to a hatchery or licensed artificial collection facility. Such domestically reared salmon may be imported under regulations established by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 662.)
-------------------------------------------

2362.

Yellowtail, barracuda, and white seabass taken in waters lying south of the maritime boundary line between the United States and Mexico, with that maritime boundary line including, but not limited to, the federal Exclusive Economic Zone boundary, may be delivered to California ports aboard boats, including boats carrying purse seine or round haul nets in accordance with those regulations as the commission may make governing the inspection and marking of those fish imported into this state. The cost of that inspection and marking shall be paid by the importer. Fish taken in Mexico shall not be imported unless legally taken and legally possessed and a declaration is submitted to the department pursuant to Section 2353.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2363.

Striped bass, sturgeon, or shad legally taken in another state that permits the sale of that fish may be imported into this state under regulations of the commission. Before the commission adopts any regulation pursuant to this section, a public hearing shall be held in the San Francisco or Sacramento area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 54.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2364.

Crab meat from outside the State may be imported into the State under regulations of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

2365.

Spiny lobsters may be imported into California until the twenty-sixth day after the close of the California season. Lobsters imported into California and lobsters legally taken in California during the open season prescribed in this code may be possessed and sold during the closed season, subject to the regulations of the commission.

The cost of inspection and marking, under the regulations of the commission, shall be paid by the importer or owner of the lobsters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1381.)
-------------------------------------------

2368.

No pismo clam taken in this State may be shipped.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

2369.

Pismo clams taken outside this state may be imported into this state when accompanied by a United States customhouse entry certificate showing their place of origin, and a certificate or clearance from the responsible governmental agency to the effect that such shipment was made in compliance with the laws and regulations of the place or country of origin. Such pismo clams may be canned and shipped outside this state.

The commission may prescribe regulations governing the inspection and marking of pismo clams imported into this state. The cost of such inspection and marking shall be paid by the importer of the pismo clams.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

2371.
